Washington statutes.
RCW 2.16.010

Association created.

All the judges of the superior courts of the state of Washington are hereby associated under the name of the superior court judges' association of the state of Washington.

[ 2016 c 179 s 2; 1933 ex.s. c 58 s 1; RRS s 11051-1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—2016 c 179: "The legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The legislature established the superior court judges' association statutorily in 1933, enacting what is now chapter 2.16 RCW. The purpose of this act is to render consistent the usage of the association's name, amending two sections to remove inconsistent uses of the association's name.

(2) For decades, the association has operated as the superior court judges' association. The association has been referred to by that name in numerous statutes, including: RCW 2.32.180 (which has used that name since 1957); RCW 2.56.150 (which has used that name since 1996); RCW 7.68.801 (which has used that name since 2013); RCW 9.94A.8673 (which has used that name since 2008); RCW 26.19.025 (which has used that name since 2007); RCW 70.96A.350 (which has used that name since 2002); and RCW 74.13.368 (which has used that name since 2009). In at least one instance in 2011, the association sued under the name superior court judges' association. Although the legislature initially used a variant of the name in its 1933 act and such a variation appears in one other statute, through long and regular usage, the association has come to be known as the superior court judges' association." [ 2016 c 179 s 1.]